src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON PERSISTSConj
# ;

 
LEXICON V10Postbase
# ;

 
LEXICON V2Postbase
# ;

 
LEXICON V3aPostbase
# ;

 
LEXICON V3cPostbase
# ;

 
LEXICON V3dPostbase
# ;

 
LEXICON V4aPostbase
# ;

 
LEXICON V4bPostbase
# ;

 
LEXICON V5aPostbase
# ;

 
LEXICON V5bPostbase
# ;

 
LEXICON V5cPostbase
# ;

 
LEXICON V6aPostbase
# ;

 
LEXICON V7aPostbase
# ;

 
LEXICON V8Postbase
# ;

 


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
