src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON IntransitiveVerbs
barlida:barlida^ V6aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
belngda:belngda^ V6aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                   ! subside, deflate, go flat
bengkoka:bengkoka^ V3aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                 ! be confused , get lost
bodda:bodda^ V6aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                       ! crouch down, hunch over, bend
borrkkirri:borrkkirri^ V7aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                             ! jump around playfull, frolic 
dange:dange^ V10Postbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                      ! stand, come to live in a place, be in a sibling relationship
dayo:dayo^ V8Postbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                         ! lie in the sun
djandi:djandi^ V7aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
djangka:djangka^ V3aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                   ! Go hunting
djerrkda:djerrkda^ V6aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
dubbedo:dubbedo^ V5aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                             ! be blocked, stuck, unable to pass
kerlkda:kerlkda^ V6aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                            ! become soft
lorrhmiyo:lorrhmiyo^ V8Postbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
medda:medda^ V6aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                               ! turn head, turn around
mokdowe:mokdowe^ V5bPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                           ! to have a sore heal
nalkbu:nalkbu^ V4bPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
ngadduhke:ngadduhke^ V2Postbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                        ! make trouble, start a fight
ngadjihbu:ngadjihbu^ V4bPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
ngarrnghma:ngarrnghma^ V5cPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
ngayke:ngayke^ V2Postbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
ngokda:ngokda^ V6aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                     ! become dark, nightfall
nguybu:nguybu^ V4bPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
yiddu:yiddu^ V5aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                       ! get angry
yonge:yonge^ V3dPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
LEXICON TransitiveVerbs
belewo:belewo^ V3cPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
bengka:bengka^ V3aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
bengmidjda:bengmidjda^ V6aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
berrebbun:berrebbu^ V4bPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                ! promise
bokde:bokde^ V10Postbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
bolkma:bolkma^ V5cPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
borrkwa:borrkwa^ V4aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
dawe:dawe^ V5bPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
djirrkka:djirrkka^ V3aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
djokkohmika:djokkohmika^ V3aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
djurrkka:djurrkka^ V3aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
dombu:dombu^ V4bPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
kebka:kebka^ V3aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
kombakke:kombakke^ V2Postbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
kukka:kukka^ V3aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
madde:madde^ V5bPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
malaka:malaka^ V3aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
mika:mika^ V3aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
ngarrkma:ngarrkma^ V5cPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
ngimihwe:ngimihwe^ V5bPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
ngimowo:ngimowo^ V3cPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
ngorrowke:ngorrowke^ V2Postbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
njabke:njabke^ V2Postbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
njirrke:njirrke^ V2Postbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
njonjwo:njonjwo^ V3cPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
rayekwo:rayekwo^ V3cPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
rokayhwo:rokayhwo^ V3cPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
widjung:widju^ V5aPostbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
yorrke:yorrke^ V2Postbase "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                   ! gather a group
